Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10H-225] Reserve standards; insurance
other than life. When long-term care benefits are provided through
insurance other than as in section 431:10H-224, reserves shall be determined by
a table certified as appropriate as a statutory valuation table by a member of
the American Academy of Actuaries and filed with the commissioner. [L 1999, c
93, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next